Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-192
Purpose of sections.

The Legislature declares that it is its intent and purpose through sections 48-192 to 48-1,109 to provide uniform procedures for the bringing of workers' compensation claims against the state, and that the procedures provided by sections 48-192 to 48-1,109 shall be used to the exclusion of all others.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 121.